Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.240

Prearrangement funeral service contracts—License required.

Only a funeral establishment licensed pursuant to this chapter may enter into prearrangement funeral service contracts.

[ 1989 c 390 s 2; 1982 c 66 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 c 66: "This act shall take effect on September 1, 1982, with the exception of sections 20, 21, and 22 of this act, which are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 26, 1982]." [ 1982 c 66 s 24.]

Transfer of records, files, and pending business—1982 c 66: "(1) All records, files, reports, papers, or other written material in the possession of the insurance commissioner pertaining to the regulation of prepaid funeral expenses shall be delivered to the director of licensing on the effective date of this act.

(2) All business or matters concerning prepaid funeral expenses pending before the insurance commissioner shall be transferred to the director of licensing and assumed by the director on the effective date of this act." [ 1982 c 66 s 17.]

Savings—1982 c 66: "The transfer of duties under sections 2 through 14 of this act shall not affect the validity of any rule, action, decision promulgated or held prior to the effective date of this act." [ 1982 c 66 s 18.]